New Mexico, session 2026, HB122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 3-7-3 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1965, Chapter 300, Section 14-7-3, as amended) is amended to read: "3-7-3. LIMITATION ON ANNEXATION.--No municipality may annex territory within the boundary of another municipality or territory within a class A county [with a population of more than three hundred thousand persons] unless approved by the board of county commissioners [for] of that county." .233164.2